Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-3401
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-3401 to 81-3455 shall be known and may be cited as the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB446, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 34.